Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Miscellaneous

§ 17-19-1440.
Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant or member of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them, shall be reduced to cash subject to known trust restrictions and deposited with the state treasurer for safekeeping; provided, however, that in the state treasurer’s discretion property may be received and held in kind. When the creditor, claimant or member furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited or property held in kind, the state treasurer shall deliver to the creditor, member or other person or his representative that amount or property.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.